Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201818-2145
Limited community redevelopment authority; laws applicable.

The provisions of the Community Development Law that are not in conflict with the provisions relating to limited community redevelopment authorities and that are necessary or convenient to carry out the powers expressly conferred upon limited community redevelopment authorities shall apply to limited community redevelopment authorities.

Laws 1969, c. 106, § 5, p. 498;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 33.
July 19, 2018